Utah statutes.
41-6a-804.   Turning or changing lanes -- Safety -- Signals -- Stopping or sudden decrease in speed -- Signal flashing -- Where prohibited.

(1) (a)  A person may not turn a vehicle or move right or left on a roadway or change lanes until:

(i)  the movement can be made with reasonable safety; and

(ii)  an appropriate signal has been given as provided under this section.

(b)  A signal of intention to turn right or left or to change lanes shall be given continuously for at least the last two seconds preceding the beginning of the movement.

(2)  A person may not stop or suddenly decrease the speed of a vehicle without first giving an appropriate signal to the operator of any vehicle immediately to the rear when there is opportunity to give a signal.

(3) (a)  A stop or turn signal when required shall be given either by the hand and arm or by signal lamps.

(b)  If hand and arm signals are used, a person operating a vehicle shall give the required hand and arm signals from the left side of the vehicle as follows:

(i)  left turn: hand and arm extended horizontally;

(ii)  right turn: hand and arm extended upward; and

(iii)  stop or decrease speed: hand and arm extended downward.

(c) (i)  A person operating a bicycle or device propelled by human power may give the required hand and arm signals for a right turn by extending the right hand and arm horizontally to the right.

(ii)  This Subsection (3)(c) is an exception to the provision of Subsection (3)(b)(ii).

(4)  A person required to make a signal under this section may not flash a signal:

(a)  on one side only on a disabled vehicle;

(b)  as a courtesy or "do pass" to operators of other vehicles approaching from the rear; or

(c)  on one side only of a parked vehicle.

